Utah statutes.
58-80a-501.   Unlawful conduct.

In addition to the definition in Subsection 58-1-501(1), "unlawful conduct" includes representing or holding oneself out as a certified medical language interpreter when not certified under this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 127, 2010 General Session

